Utah statutes.
78A-2-229.   Documents provided to pro se litigants.
(1)  Documents classified as private, protected, or sealed by court rule and
are provided to a pro se litigant in the course of an action or in accordance
with Subsection 63G-2-202(7) may not be distributed, released, or displayed to
any other person except the court, the other party and their counsel, or any
other person who may be authorized by the court to inspect the documents.
(2)  Pro se litigants shall be advised by the court that  private, protected,
or sealed documents received by the party that the party would not have
received but for the litigation and pro se representation are confidential and
may not be distributed outside the parties or the court without prior
authorization by the court.  A court's failure to give this notice may not be
used as a defense to prosecution for a violation of the disclosure rule.
(3)  Violation of this section is:
(a)  punishable by contempt if distribution or release occurs before a final
determination is made by the court and the court still has jurisdiction over
the parties; or
(b)  a class B misdemeanor if the litigation has been concluded and the court
no longer has jurisdiction over the parties.
